District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.58

Consideration of additional information.

If the recipient submits additional information, the representative of the Mayor will give it due consideration to determine whether the information changes the Mayor’s previous decision to reduce or terminate the assistance payment, and will notify the recipient accordingly, advising him or her of his or her right to a fair hearing.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 558, 29 DCR 1060
1981 Ed., § 3-205.58.